North Dakota, session 69, HB1374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 44-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Township onsite inspections - Exemption .
An onsite inspection conducted under section 2 of this Act is an exempt meeting .
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 58-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Onsite inspections - Exempt meeting .
1. A gathering of the members of a board of township supervisors to conduct an onsite
inspection under this title is an exempt meeting as defined under section 44 - 04 - 17.1 if :
a. The township does not have staff available that is capable of making the inspection; or
b. The board of township supervisors is serving as the township officers and the staff of the
township.
2. The board of township supervisors shall make good-faith efforts to provide notice of the
inspections to each news medium that has filed a written request for notice if the request
includes the news medium's telephone number. The notice must be given by telephone or by
any other method used to notify the members of the public body.

H. B. NO. 1374 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1374.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 3 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State